Kansas, session 2025-2026, HB2005.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Kansas:
Section 1. (a) This act shall be known and may be cited as the
veterans' valor property tax relief act.
(b) There shall be allowed as a credit against the tax liability of a
taxpayer imposed under the Kansas income tax act for tax year 2025, and
all tax years thereafter, in an amount equal to 75% 50% of the amount of
property and ad valorem taxes actually and timely paid by a taxpayer who
has been deemed to be totally disabled, permanently and totally disabled,
or unemployable pursuant to 38 C.F.R. § 3.340 if such taxes were paid
upon real or personal property used for residential purposes of such
taxpayer that is the taxpayer's principal place of residence for the tax year
in which the tax credit is claimed.
(c) The amount of any such credit for any such taxpayer shall not
exceed the amount of property and ad valorem taxes paid by such taxpayer
as specified in this section. A taxpayer shall not take the credit pursuant to
this section if such taxpayer has received a homestead property tax refund
pursuant to K.S.A. 79-4501 et seq., and amendments thereto, or a credit
pursuant to the selective assistance for effective senior relief pursuant to
K.S.A. 79-32,263, and amendments thereto, for such property for such tax
year.
(d) Subject to the provisions of this section, if the amount of such tax
credit exceeds the taxpayer's income tax liability for the taxable year, the
amount of such excess credit that exceeds such tax liability shall be
refunded to the taxpayer.
(e) The secretary of revenue shall adopt rules and regulations
regarding the filing of documents that support the amount of the credit
claimed pursuant to this section.
(f) The provisions of this act shall be a part of and supplemental to
the homestead property tax refund act, except that the income or appraised
valuation limits set forth in the homestead property tax refund act shall not

HB 2005—Am. by HC 2
apply to this section.
Sec. 2. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its
publication in the statute book.